Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1497
Tenant; authority to rent to another.

A tenant may rent the mobile home to another only upon written agreement with the mobile home park management. The landlord may require a guarantee from the tenant for the sublessee's mobile home space rent.

Laws 1984, LB 916, § 48.